Utah statutes.
7-7-35.   Sale of real estate securities -- Dealing with buyer -- Liability
of original borrower.
In the case of an investment made by an association in a real estate loan, in
the event the ownership of the real estate security or any part thereof
becomes vested in a person other than the party or parties originally
executing the security instruments, and providing there is no agreement in
writing to the contrary, an association may, without notice to the party or
parties, deal with the successor or successors in interest with reference to
the mortgage or trust deed and the debt secured by it in the same manner as
with the party or parties. The association may forbear to sue or may extend
time for payment of or otherwise modify the terms of the debt secured by that
real estate, without discharging or in any way affecting the original
liability of the party or parties.
